Massachusetts, session 194th, S3061.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2002 is hereby amended in Section 1 by striking 
the words "for the purposes set forth in Section 2" following the word, "appropriate". 
SECTION 2. Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2002 is hereby further amended by striking Section 
2 in its entirety.  
SECTION 3. Chapter 9 of the Acts of 2002 is hereby further amended by striking Section 
6 in its entirety.  
SECTION 4. This act shall take effect upon passage.